Hawaii statutes.
[§88-49.3] Employees paid from certain
federal funds. Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, a
participant in a work-experience, on-the-job training, or a temporary public
service employment position whose salary is paid in whole or in part from
federal funds provided under the Comprehensive Employment and Training Act of
1973 (Public Law 93-203; 87 Stat. 839), as amended, shall not be eligible for
membership in the system from and after July 1, 1978, except as provided
for in this section.

Any such participant who is a member of the
system on June 30, 1978, shall remain a member of the system unless the
participant elects in writing on a form prescribed by the board to terminate
the participant's membership. An election shall not be effective unless filed
on or before December 31, 1978. Any participant who elects to terminate
the participant's membership in accordance with this section shall be paid all
of the participant's accumulated contributions. [L 1978, c 240, §1; gen ch 1985]

Attorney General Opinions

Capacity to make election. Att. Gen. Op. 86-2.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next